Nebraska, session 109, LB942.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB942 LB942
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-901 Sections 68-901 to 68-9,111 and sections 2 to 4 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of sections 2 and 3 of this act:
(1) Emergency medical condition means a medical condition
manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, including
severe pain, such that a prudent layperson could reasonably expect the
absence of immediate medical attention to result in (a) placing the
patient's health in serious jeopardy, (b) serious impairment to bodily
functions, or (c) serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part; and
(2) Prudent layperson means an individual who possesses an average
knowledge of health and medicine.
Sec. 3. (1) The department or a managed care organization shall
determine whether a service provided to a medicaid recipient in an
emergency department is an emergency medical condition based solely on
the recipient's presenting symptoms, medical condition, or clinical
presentation at the time the recipient sought care as perceived by a
prudent layperson.
(2)(a) The department or a managed care organization shall not
determine services to be nonemergent, or reduce or deny reimbursement for
such services, based on the final diagnosis, discharge code, or any
condition identified after completion of the medical screening
examination required under the federal Emergency Medical Treatment and
Labor Act. A payment policy, a screening tool, an algorithm, or a
diagnosis list used for determining emergent or nonemergent status that
is based on the final diagnosis is prohibited.
(b) The department or a managed care organization shall not reduce
reimbursement for emergent services to any fractional amount based on a
classification of such services as nonemergent.
(3) Emergency services provided to a medicaid recipient by a
-2-

LB942 LB942
2026 2026
hospital or an emergency care provider shall be reimbursed at a rate no
less than the medicaid fee-for-service rate in effect at the time the
services were provided.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the department or a managed
care organization from negotiating a higher rate with a contracting
provider if the negotiated rate is not lower than the minimum rate
required under subsection (3) of this section.
Sec. 4. (1) For purposes of reimbursement, a medicaid recipient is
an inpatient of a hospital if such recipient is formally admitted as an
inpatient pursuant to an order for admission by a physician or other
qualified practitioner. The order shall be furnished by a physician or
other qualified practitioner with admitting privileges at such hospital,
as permitted by state law, and who is knowledgeable about the recipient's
hospital course, medical plan of care, and current condition.
(2) An inpatient admission is appropriate for reimbursement under
the medical assistance program if the admitting physician or other
qualified practitioner expects the recipient to require the length of
hospital care to last at least two consecutive midnights, regardless of
the facility or hospital location at which the two consecutive midnights
occur.
(3) The expectation of the physician or other qualified practitioner
shall be based on medical factors including, but not limited to, the
recipient's, (a) medical history and comorbidities, (b) severity of
symptoms, (c) current medical needs, and (d) risk of an adverse event.
The factors that support the physician's or other qualified
practitioner's clinical expectation shall be documented in the medical
record.
(4) If an unforeseen circumstance, including death or transfer,
results in a shorter inpatient stay than the expectation of at least two
consecutive midnights, the medicaid recipient may be considered to be
treated on an inpatient basis and reimbursement for an inpatient hospital
-3-

LB942 LB942
2026 2026
stay may be made under the medical assistance program consistent with
medicare regulations.
(5) If the physician or other qualified practitioner expects a
recipient to require hospital care for a period of time that does not
meet the two consecutive midnights requirement described in subsection
(3) of this section, an inpatient admission may be appropriate for
reimbursement under the medical assistance program based on the clinical
judgment of the physician or other qualified practitioner and the medical
record. The physician's or other qualified practitioner's decision shall
be based on medical factors including, but not limited to, the
recipient's, (a) medical history and comorbidities, (b) severity of
symptoms, (c) current medical needs, and (d) risk of an adverse event.
Sec. 5. Original section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-